Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-105 Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Affiliate" means a person who,
directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is
controlled by, or is under common control with an insolvent insurer on December
31 of the year immediately preceding the date the insurer becomes an insolvent
insurer.

"Association" means the Hawaii
insurance guaranty association created under section 431:16-106.

"Claimant" means any insured making a
first party claim or any person instituting a liability claim; provided that no
person who is an affiliate of the insolvent insurer may be a claimant.

"Control" means the possession,
direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the
management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting
securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or
nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an
official position with or corporate office held by the person. Control shall
be presumed to exist if any person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls,
holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing, ten per cent or
more of the voting securities of any other person. This presumption may be
rebutted by a showing that control does not exist in fact.

"Covered claim":

(1) Means an unpaid claim, including one for unearned
premiums, submitted by a claimant, that arises out of and is within the
coverage and is subject to the applicable limits of an insurance policy to
which this part applies issued by an insurer, if the insurer becomes an
insolvent insurer after July 1, 2000, and:

(A) The claimant or insured is a resident of
this State at the time of the insured event; provided that for entities other
than an individual, the residence of a claimant, insured, or policyholder is
the state in which its principal place of business is located at the time of
the insured event; or

(B) The claim is a first party claim for
damage to property with a permanent location in this State; and

(2) Shall not include:

(A) Any amount awarded as punitive or
exemplary damages;

(B) Any amount sought as a return of premium
under any retrospective rating plan;

(C) Any amount due any reinsurer, insurer,
insurance pool, or underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries,
reinsurance recoveries, contribution, indemnification, or otherwise;

(D) Any first party claims by an insured
whose net worth exceeds $25,000,000 on December 31 of the year prior to the
year in which the insurer becomes an insolvent insurer; provided that an
insured's net worth on that date shall be deemed to include the aggregate net
worth of the insured and all of its subsidiaries as calculated on a
consolidated basis;

(E) Any first party claims by an insured who
is an affiliate of the insolvent insurer;

(F) Any fee or other amount relating to goods
or services sought by or on behalf of any attorney or other provider of goods
or services retained by the insolvent insurer or an insured prior to the date
it was determined to be insolvent;

(G) Any fee or other amount sought by or on
behalf of any attorney or other provider of goods or services retained by any
insured or claimant in connection with the assertion or prosecution of any
claim, covered or otherwise, against the association;

(H) Any claims for interest; or

(I) Any claim filed with the association or a
liquidator for protection afforded under the insured's policy for incurred but
not reported losses.

"Insolvent insurer" means an insurer
licensed to transact insurance in this State, either at the time the policy was
issued or when the insured event occurred, and against whom a final order of
liquidation has been entered after May 16, 2000 with a finding of insolvency by
a court of competent jurisdiction in the insurer's state of domicile.

"Insured" means any named insured,
any additional insured, any vendor, any lessor, or any other party identified
as an insured under the policy.

"Member insurer" means any person
who:

(1) Writes any kind of insurance to which this part
applies under section 431:16-103, including the exchange of reciprocal or
inter-insurance contracts; and

(2) Is licensed to transact insurance in this State.

An insurer shall cease to be a member insurer
effective on the day following the termination or expiration of its certificate
of authority to transact the kinds of insurance to which this part applies.
However, the insurer shall remain liable as a member insurer for any and all
obligations, including obligations for assessments levied either prior to or
after the termination or expiration of its certificate of authority, even
though the insurer became insolvent before the termination or expiration of its
certificate of authority.

"Net direct written premiums" means
direct gross premiums written in this State on insurance policies to which this
part applies, including policy and membership fees, less the following amounts:

(1) Return premiums;

(2) Premiums on policies not taken; and

(3) Dividends paid or credited to policyholders on
such direct business.

Net direct written premiums shall not include
premiums on contracts between insurers or reinsurers.

"Person" means any individual,
corporation, partnership, association, or voluntary organization.

"Receiver" includes liquidator,
rehabilitator, conservator, or ancillary receiver, as applicable.

"Self-insurer" means a person that
covers its liability through a qualified individual or group self-insurance
program or any other formal program created for the specific purpose of
covering liabilities typically covered by insurance. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2;
am L 2000, c 93, §4; am L 2012, c 250, §1]

Revision Note

"May 16, 2000" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Case Notes

In light of the legislature's silence on the meaning and
means of valuing "net worth" under this section, "net
worth" may be "book" or "balance sheet" net worth as
governed by generally accepted accounting principles. 123 H. 135 (App.), 231
P.3d 60 (2010).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next